North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 4. Organization and System for Delivery of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.
§ 122C-152.
Liability insurance and waiver of immunity as to torts of agents, employees, and board members.

An area authority, by securing liability insurance as provided in this section, may waive its governmental immunity from liability for damage by reason of death or injury to person or property caused by the negligence or tort of any agent, employee, or board member of the area authority when acting within the scope of his authority or within the course of his duties or employment. Governmental immunity is waived by the act of obtaining this insurance, but it is waived by only to the extent that the area authority is indemnified by insurance for the negligence or tort.

Any contract of insurance purchased pursuant to this section shall be issued by a company or corporation licensed and authorized to execute insurance contracts in this State and shall by its terms adequately insure the area authority against any and all liability for any damages by reason of death or injury to a person or property proximately caused by the negligent acts or torts of the agents, employees, and board members of the area authority when acting within the course of their duties or employment. The area board shall determine the extent of the liability and what agents, employees by class, and board members are covered by any insurance purchased pursuant to this subsection. Any company or corporation that enters into a contract of insurance as described in this section with the authority, by this act waives any defense based upon the governmental immunity of the area authority.

Any persons sustaining damages, or, in the case of death, his personal representative, may sue an area authority insured under this section for the recovery of damages in any court of competent jurisdiction in this State, but only in a county located within the geographic limits of the authority. It is no defense to any action that the negligence or tort complained of was in pursuance of a governmental or discretionary function of the area authority if, and to the extent that, the authority has insurance coverage as provided by this section.

Except as expressly provided by subsection (c) of this section, nothing in this section deprives any area authority of any defense whatsoever to any action for damages or to restrict, limit, or otherwise affect any defense which the area authority may have at common law or by virtue of any statute. Nothing in this section relieves any person sustaining damages nor any personal representative of any decedent from any duty to give notice of a claim to the area authority or to commence any civil action for the recovery of damages within the applicable period of time prescribed or limited by statute.

The area authority may incur liability pursuant to this section only with respect to a claim arising after the authority has procured liability insurance pursuant to this section and during the time when the insurance is in force.

No part of the pleadings that relate to or allege facts as to a defendant’s insurance against liability may be read or mentioned in the presence of the trial jury in any action brought pursuant to this section. This liability does not attach unless the plaintiff waives the right to have all issues of law or fact relating to insurance in the action determined by a jury. These issues shall be heard and determined by the judge, and the jury shall be absent during any motions, arguments, testimony, or announcement of findings of fact or conclusions of law with respect to insurance.

History.

1981, c. 539, s. 2; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-153.
Defense of agents, employees, and board members.

Upon request made by or in behalf of any agent, employee, or board member or former agent, employee, or board member of the area authority, any area authority may provide for the defense of any civil or criminal action or proceeding brought against him either in his official or in his individual capacity, or both, on account of any act done or omission made, or any act allegedly done or omission allegedly made, in the scope and course of his duty as an agent, employee, or board member. The defense may be provided by the local board by employing counsel or by purchasing insurance that requires that the insurer provide the defense. Nothing in this section requires any area authority to provide for the defense of any action or proceeding of any nature.

An area authority may budget funds for the purpose of paying all or part of the claim made or any civil judgment entered against any of its agents, employees, or board members or former agents, employees, or board members when a claim is made or judgment is rendered as damages on account of any act done or omission made, or any act allegedly done or omission allegedly made, in the scope and course of his duty as an agent, employee, or board member of the area authority. Nothing in this section shall authorize any area authority to budget funds for the purpose of paying any claim made or civil judgment against any of its agents, employees, or board members, or former agents, employees, or board members, if the authority finds that the agent, employee, or board member acted or failed to act because of actual fraud, corruption, or actual malice on his part. Any authority may budget for and purchase insurance coverage for payment of claims or judgments pursuant to this section. Nothing in this section requires any authority to pay any claim or judgment referred to, and the purchase of insurance coverage for payment of the claim or judgment may not be considered an assumption of any liability not covered by the insurance contract and may not be deemed an assumption of liability or payment of any claim or judgment in excess of the limits of coverage in the insurance contract.

Subsection (b) of this section does not authorize an authority to pay all or part of a claim made or civil judgment entered or to provide a defense to a criminal charge unless (i) notice of the claim or litigation is given to the area authority before the time that the claim is settled or civil judgment is entered; and (ii) the area authority has adopted, and made available for public inspection, uniform standards under which claims made, civil judgments entered, or criminal charges against agents, employees, or board members or former agents, employees, or board members shall be defended or paid.

The board or boards of county commissioners that establish the area authority and the Secretary may allocate funds not otherwise restricted by law, in addition to the funds allocated for the operation of the program, for the purpose of paying legal defense, judgments, and settlements under this section.

History.

1981, c. 539, s. 2; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-154.
Personnel.

Employees under the direct supervision of the area director are employees of the area authority. For the purpose of personnel administration, Chapter 126 of the General Statutes applies unless otherwise provided in this Article. Employees appointed by the county program director are employees of the county. In a multicounty program, employment of county program staff shall be as agreed upon in the interlocal agreement adopted pursuant to

G.S. 122C-115.1

. Notwithstanding G.S. 126-9(b), an employee of an area authority may be paid a salary that is in excess of the salary ranges established by the State Human Resources Commission. Any salary that is higher than the maximum of the applicable salary range shall be supported by documentation of comparable salaries in comparable operations within the region and shall also include the specific amount the board proposes to pay the employee. The area board shall not authorize any salary adjustment that is above the normal allowable salary range without obtaining prior approval from the Director of the Office of State Human Resources.

History.

1971, c. 470, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; 1977, c. 568, s. 1; c. 679, s. 7; 1979, c. 358, s. 14; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2001-437, s. 1.18; 2012-151, s. 11(b); 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 122C-155.
Supervision of services.

Unless otherwise specified, client services are the responsibility of a qualified professional. Direct medical and psychiatric services shall be provided by a qualified psychiatrist or a physician with adequate training and experience acceptable to the Secretary.

History.

1971, c. 470, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; 1977, c. 568, s. 1; c. 679, s. 7; 1979, c. 358, s. 14; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-156.
Salary plan for employees of the area authority.

The area authority shall establish a salary plan which shall set the salaries for employees of the area authority. The salary plan shall be in compliance with Chapter 126 of the General Statutes. In a multi-county area, the salary plan shall not exceed the highest paying salary plan of any county in that area. In a single-county area, the salary plan shall not exceed the county’s salary plan. The salary plan limitations set forth in this section may be exceeded only if the area authority and the board or boards of county commissioners, as the case may be, jointly agree to exceed these limitations.

An area authority may purchase life insurance or health insurance or both for the benefit of all or any class of authority officers or employees as a part of its compensation. An area authority may provide other fringe benefits for authority officers and employees.

An area authority that is providing health insurance under subsection (b) of this section may provide health insurance for all or any class of former officers and employees of the area authority who are receiving benefits under Article 3 of Chapter 128 of the General Statutes. Health insurance may be paid entirely by the area authority, partly by the area authority and former officer or employee, or entirely by the former officer or employee, at the option of the area board.

History.

1977, c. 568, s. 1; 1979, c. 358, ss. 15, 23; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-157.
Establishment of a professional reimbursement policy.

The area authority shall adopt and enforce a professional reimbursement policy. This policy shall (i) require that fees for the provision of services received directly under the supervision of the area authority shall be paid to the area authority, (ii) prohibit employees of the area authority from providing services on a private basis which require the use of the resources and facilities of the area authority, and (iii) provide that employees may not accept dual compensation and dual employment unless they have the written permission of the area authority.

History.

1977, c. 568, s. 1; 1979, c. 358, s. 17; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-158.
Privacy of personnel records.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 132-6

or any other State statute concerning access to public records, personnel files of employees or applicants for employment maintained by an area authority are subject to inspection and may be disclosed only as provided by this section. For purposes of this section, an employee’s personnel file consists of any information in any form gathered by the area authority with respect to that employee, including his application, selection or nonselection, performance, promotions, demotions, transfers, suspensions and other disciplinary actions, evaluation forms, leave, salary, and termination of employment. As used in this section, “employee” includes former employees of the area authority.

The following information with respect to each employee is a matter of public record:

Name.

Age.

Date of original employment or appointment to the area authority.

The terms of any contract by which the employee is employed whether written or oral, past and current, to the extent that the agency has the written contract or a record of the oral contract in its possession.

Current position.

Title.

Current salary.

Date and amount of each increase or decrease in salary with that area authority.

Date and type each promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension, separation, or other change in position classification with that area authority.

Date and general description of the reasons for each promotion with that area authority.

Date and type of each dismissal, suspension, or demotion for disciplinary reasons taken by the area authority. If the disciplinary action was a dismissal, a copy of the written notice of the final decision of the area authority setting forth the specific acts or omissions that are the basis of the dismissal.

The office to which the employee is currently assigned.

(b1)

For the purposes of this subsection, the term “salary” includes pay, benefits, incentives, bonuses, and deferred and all other forms of compensation paid by the employing entity.

(b2)

The area authority shall determine in what form and by whom this information will be maintained. Any person may have access to this information for the purpose of inspection, examination, and copying during regular business hours, subject only to rules for the safekeeping of public records as the area authority may have adopted. Any person denied access to this information may apply to the appropriate division of the General Court of Justice for an order compelling disclosure, and the court shall have jurisdiction to issue these orders.

All information contained in an employee’s personnel file, other than the information made public by subsection (b) of this section, is confidential and is open to inspection only in the following instances:

The employee or an authorized agent may examine portions of his personnel file except (i) letters of reference solicited before employment, and (ii) information concerning a medical disability, mental or physical, that a prudent physician would not divulge to a patient.

A licensed physician designated in writing by the employee may examine the employee’s medical record.

An area authority employee having supervisory authority over the employee may examine all material in the employee’s personnel file.

By order of a court of competent jurisdiction, any person may examine the part of an employee’s personnel file that is ordered by the court.

An official of an agency of the State or federal government, or any political subdivision of the State, may inspect any part of a personnel file pursuant to G.S. 122C-25(b) or G.S. 122C-192(a) or when the inspection is considered by the official having custody of the records to be inspected to be necessary and essential to the pursuance of a proper function of the inspecting agency. No information may be divulged for the purpose of assisting in a criminal prosecution of the employee or for the purpose of assisting in an investigation of the employee’s tax liability. However, the official having custody of the records may release the name, address, and telephone number from a personnel file for the purpose of assisting in a criminal investigation.

An employee may sign a written release, to be placed with the employee’s personnel file, that permits the person with custody of the file to provide, either in person, by telephone or by mail, information specified in the release to prospective employers, educational institutions, or other persons specified in the release.

The area authority may tell any person of the employment or nonemployment, promotion, demotion, suspension, or other disciplinary action, reinstatement, transfer, or termination of an employee and the reasons for that personnel action. Before releasing the information, the area authority shall determine in writing that the release is essential to maintaining public confidence in the administration of services or to maintaining the level and quality of services. This written determination shall be retained as a record for public inspection and shall become part of the employee’s personnel file.

Even if considered part of an employee’s personnel file, the following information need not be disclosed to an employee nor to any other person:

Testing or examination material used solely to determine individual qualifications for appointment, employment, or promotion in the area authority service, when disclosure would compromise the objectivity or the fairness of the testing or examination process.

Investigative reports or memoranda and other information concerning the investigation of possible criminal action of an employee, until the investigation is completed and no criminal action taken, or until the criminal action is concluded.

Information that might identify an undercover law-enforcement officer or a law-enforcement informer.

Notes, preliminary drafts, and internal communications concerning an employee. In the event these materials are used for any official personnel decision, then the employee or an authorized agent has a right to inspect these materials.

The area authority may permit access, subject to limitations it may impose, to selected personnel files by a professional representative of a training, research, or academic institution if that representative certifies that he will not release information identifying the employees whose files are opened and that the information will be used solely for statistical, research, or teaching purposes. This certification shall be retained by the area authority as long as each personnel file so examined is retained.

The area authority that maintains personnel files containing information other than the information mentioned in subsection (b) of this section shall establish procedures whereby an employee who objects to material in the employee’s file on grounds that it is inaccurate or misleading may seek to have the material removed from the file or may place in the file a statement relating to the material.

Permitting access, other than that authorized by this section, to a personnel file of an employee of an area authority is a Class 3 misdemeanor and is punishable only by a fine, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00).

Anyone who, knowing that he is not authorized to do so, examines, removes, or copies information in a personnel file of an employee of an area authority is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and is punishable only by a fine, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00).

History.

1983, c. 281; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, ss. 924, 925; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2007-508, s. 3; 2010-169, s. 18(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-508, s. 3, effective August 30, 2007, in subsection (b), inserted “the terms of any contract by which the employee is employed whether written or oral, past and current, to the extent that the board has the written contract or a record of the oral contract in its possession” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

Session Laws 2010-169, s. 18(d), effective October 1, 2010, subdivided subsection (b), adding the subdivision designations and making multiple stylistic changes; in subdivision (a)(8), substituted “each increase or decrease in salary with that area authority” for “most recent increase or decrease in salary”; in subdivision (a)(9), substituted “Date and type of each promotion” for “date of most recent promotion,” and added “with that area authority”; added subdivisions (a)(10) and (a)(11); and added the subsection (b1) and (b2) designations.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Fired by Liars: Due Process Implications in the Recent Changes to North Carolina’s Public Disclosure Laws,” 89 N.C.L. Rev. 2228 (2011).

§§ 122C-159 through 122C-169.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 4A. Consumer and Family Advisory Committees.

§ 122C-170.
Local Consumer and Family Advisory Committees.

Area authorities shall establish committees made up of consumers and family members to be known as Consumer and Family Advisory Committees (CFACS). A local CFAC shall be a self-governing and a self-directed organization that advises the area authority in its catchment area on the planning and management of the local public mental health, intellectual and developmental disabilities, substance use disorder, and traumatic brain injury services system.Each CFAC shall adopt bylaws to govern the selection and appointment of its members, their terms of service, the number of members, and other procedural matters. At the request of either the CFAC or the governing board of the area authority, the CFAC and the governing board shall execute an agreement that identifies the roles and responsibilities of each party, channels of communication between the parties, and a process for resolving disputes between the parties.

Each of the disability groups shall be equally represented on the CFAC, and the CFAC shall reflect as closely as possible the racial and ethnic composition of the catchment area. The terms of members shall be three years, and no member may serve more than three consecutive terms. The CFAC shall be composed exclusively of:

Adult consumers of mental health, intellectual and developmental disabilities, substance use disorder, and traumatic brain injury services.

Family members of consumers of mental health, intellectual and development disabilities, substance use disorder, and traumatic brain injury services.

The CFAC shall undertake all of the following:

Review, comment on, and monitor the implementation of the contract deliverables between area authorities and the Department of Health and Human Services.

Identify service gaps and underserved populations.

Make recommendations regarding the service array and monitor the development of additional services.

Review and comment on the area authority budget.

Develop a collaborative and working relationship with the area authorities member advisory committees to obtain input related to service delivery and system change issues.

Submit to the State Consumer and Family Advisory Committee findings and recommendations regarding ways to improve the delivery of mental health, intellectual and developmental disabilities, substance use disorder, and traumatic brain injury services, including Statewide issues.

The director of the area authority shall provide sufficient staff to assist the CFAC in implementing its duties under subsection (c) of this section. The assistance shall include data for the identification of service gaps and underserved populations, training to review and comment on contract deliverables and budgets, procedures to allow participation in quality monitoring, and technical advice on rules of procedure and applicable laws.

History.

2006-142, s. 5; 2012-151, s. 5; 2021-77, s. 8.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-77, s. 8.1, effective July 2, 2021, in subsection (a), deleted “and county programs” following “Area authorities” and “or county program” following “area authority”, and substituted “intellectual and developmental disabilities, substance use disorder, and traumatic brain injury services” for “developmental disabilities, substance abuse services and”; substituted “authority” for “authority or county program” in the last paragraph of subsection (a); substituted “intellectual and developmental disabilities, substance use disorder, and traumatic brain injury services” for “developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services” in subdivisions (b)(1) and (b)(2); substituted “contract deliverables between area authorities and the Department of Health and Human Services” for “local business plan” in subdivision (c)(1); deleted “or county program” following “authority” in subdivision (c)(4); rewrote subdivision (c)(5); substituted “intellectual and developmental disabilities, substance use disorder, and traumatic brain injury services, including Statewide issues” for “developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services” in subdivision (c)(6); and in subsection (d), deleted “or county program” following “area authority” in the first sentence, and substituted “contract deliverables” for “business plans” in the second sentence.

§ 122C-171.
State Consumer and Family Advisory Committee.

There is established the State Consumer and Family Advisory Committee (State CFAC). The State CFAC shall be a self-governing and self-directed organization that advises the Department and the General Assembly on the planning and management of the State’s public mental health, intellectual and developmental disabilities, substance use disorder, and traumatic brain injury services system.

The State CFAC shall be composed of 21 members. The members shall be composed exclusively of adult consumers of mental health, intellectual and developmental disabilities, substance use disorder, and traumatic brain injury services and family members of consumers of mental health, intellectual and developmental disabilities, substance use disorder, and traumatic brain injury services. The terms of members shall be three years, and no member may serve more than two consecutive terms. Vacancies shall be filled by the appointing authority. The members shall be appointed as follows:

Nine members appointed by the Secretary. The Secretary’s appointments shall reflect each of the disability groups. The terms shall be staggered so that terms of three of the appointees expire each year.

Four members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate as follows:

One member from the eastern region of the State.

One member from the central region of the State.

Two members from the western region of the State.

The terms of the appointees shall be staggered so that the term of one appointee expires every year.

Four members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives as follows:

One member from the eastern region of the State.

Two members from the central region of the State.

One member from the western region of the State.

The terms of the appointees shall be staggered so that the term of one appointee expires every year.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-77, s. 4(a), effective July 2, 2021, and applicable only to appointments to the Consumer and Family Advisory Committee made on or after that date.

Four members appointed by the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners as follows:

Two members from the eastern region of the State.

One member from the central region of the State.

One member from the western region of the State.

The terms of the appointees shall be staggered so that the term of one appointee expires every year.

The State CFAC shall undertake all of the following:

Review, comment on, and monitor the implementation of the State Plan for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.

Identify service gaps and underserved populations.

Make recommendations regarding the service array and monitor the development of additional services.

Review and comment on the State budget for mental health, intellectual and developmental disabilities, substance use disorder, and traumatic brain injury services.

Review and comment on contract deliverables and the process and outcomes of prepaid health plans in meeting these contract deliverables.

Receive the findings and recommendations by local CFACs regarding ways to improve the delivery of mental health, intellectual and developmental disabilities, substance use disorder, and traumatic brain injury services, including Statewide issues.

Develop a collaborative and working relationship with the prepaid health plan member advisory committees to obtain input related to service delivery and system change issues.

The Secretary shall provide sufficient staff to assist the State CFAC in implementing its duties under subsection (c) of this section. The assistance shall include data for the identification of service gaps and underserved populations, training to review and comment on the State Plan and departmental budget, procedures to allow participation in quality monitoring, and technical advice on rules of procedure and applicable laws.

State CFAC members shall receive the per diem and allowances prescribed by

G.S. 138-5

for State boards and commissions.

History.

2006-142, s. 5; 2009-50, s. 1; 2021-77, s. 4(a).

§§ 122C-172 through 122C-180.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 5. State Facilities.

§ 122C-181.
Secretary’s jurisdiction over State facilities.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Secretary shall operate the following facilities:

Psychiatric Hospitals:

Cherry Hospital.

a1.

Central Regional Hospital.

, c.Repealed by Session Laws 2007-177, s. 2. See Editor’s note.

d.

Broughton Hospital.

Developmental Centers:

Caswell Developmental Center.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-177, s. 1, effective July 5, 2007.

b1.

J. Iverson Riddle Developmental Center.

Murdoch Developmental Center.

through e. Repealed by Session Laws 2007-177, s. 1, effective July 5, 2007.

Alcohol and Drug Treatment Centers:

Walter B. Jones Alcohol and Drug Abuse Treatment Center.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-177, s. 1, effective July 5, 2007.

Julian F. Keith Alcohol and Drug Abuse Treatment Center.

R.J. Blackley Alcohol and Drug Treatment Center.

Neuro-Medical Treatment Centers:

through c. Repealed by Session Laws 2007-177, s. 1, effective July 5, 2007.

d.

Black Mountain Neuro-Medical Treatment Center.

e.

O’Berry Neuro-Medical Treatment Center.

f.

Longleaf Neuro-Medical Treatment Center.

Residential Programs for Children:

Whitaker School.

Wright School.

Subject to the requirements of subsection (c) of this section, the Secretary may, with the approval of the Governor and Council of State, close any State facility.

Closure of a State facility under subsection (b) of this section becomes effective on the earlier of the 31st legislative day or the day of adjournment of the next regular session of the General Assembly that begins at least 10 days after the date the closure is approved, unless a different effective date applies under this subsection. If a bill that specifically disapproves the State facility closure is introduced in either house of the General Assembly before the thirty-first legislative day of that session, the closure becomes effective on the earlier of either the day an unfavorable final action is taken on the bill or the day that session of the General Assembly adjourns without ratifying a bill that specifically disapproves the State facility closure. If the Secretary specifies a later effective date for closure than the date that would otherwise apply under this subsection, the later date applies. Closure of a State facility does not become effective if the closure is specifically disapproved by a bill enacted into law before it becomes effective. Notwithstanding any rule of either house of the General Assembly, any member of the General Assembly may introduce a bill during the first 30 legislative days of any regular session to disapprove closure of a facility that has been approved by the Governor and Council of State as provided in subsection (b) of this section. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to impair the Secretary’s power or duty otherwise imposed by law to close a State facility temporarily for the protection of health and safety.

History.

Code, ss. 2227, 2240; 1899, c. 1, s. 1; Rev., s. 4542; C.S., s. 6151; 1945, c. 952, s. 8; 1947, c. 537, s. 2; 1949, c. 1206, s. 1; 1955, c. 887, s. 1; 1959, c. 348, s. 1; c. 1002, s. 1; c. 1008; c. 1028, ss. 1-4; 1961, c. 513; c. 1173, ss. 1, 2, 4; 1963, c. 1166, ss. 2, 10, 12; c. 1184, s. 6; 1967, c. 151; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 476, ss. 128, 133, 138; 1975, c. 19, s. 41; 1977, c. 679, s. 7; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; c. 77; c. 412, s. 4; 1983, c. 383, s. 9; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 145, s. 1; 1991, c. 689, s. 136; 2001-437, s. 1.19; 2001-487, s. 80(a); 2007-177, ss. 1, 2.

§ 122C-182.
Authority to contract with area authorities.

To establish a coordinated system of services for its clients, a State facility shall contract with an area authority. Contracted services shall meet the rules of the Commission and the Secretary.

History.

1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-183.
Appointment of employees as police officers who may arrest without warrant.

The director of each State facility may appoint as special police officers the number of employees of their respective facilities they consider necessary. Within the grounds of the State facility the employees appointed as special police officers have all the powers of police officers of cities. The Secretary, or the Secretary’s designee, may assign these special police officers to other State-operated facilities on a temporary basis to carry out the powers allowed under this section and as otherwise provided by laws relating to the specific joint security force to which they are assigned. Upon this temporary assignment, the special police officer will take the oath in

G.S. 122C-184

for that specific facility. Following the oath, the police officer has the right to arrest without warrant individuals committing violations of the State law or the ordinances or rules of that facility in their presence and to bring the offenders before a magistrate who shall proceed as in other criminal cases.

History.

1899, c. 1, s. 55; 1901, c. 627; Rev., s. 4569; C.S., s. 6181; 1921, c. 207; 1957, c. 1232, s. 12; 1959, c. 1002, s. 12; 1973, c. 108, s. 73; c. 673, s. 12.1; 1981, c. 635, s. 5; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2019-240, s. 19(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-240, s. 19(a), effective November 6, 2019, added the third and fourth sentences and in the fifth sentence substituted “Following the oath, the police officer has” for “They have.”

§ 122C-184.
Oath of special police officers.

Before exercising the duties of a special police officer, the employees appointed under

G.S. 122C-183

shall take an oath or affirmation of office before an officer empowered to administer oaths. The oath or affirmation shall be filed with the records of the Department. The oath or affirmation of office is:

State of North Carolina: County. I, , do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will well and truly execute the duties of office of special police officer in and for the State facility called , according to the best of my skill and ability and according to law; and that I will use my best endeavors to enforce all the ordinances of said facility, and to suppress nuisances, and to suppress and prevent disorderly conduct within these grounds. So help me, God. Sworn and subscribed before me, this day of , A.D. .

Click to view

History.

1899, c. 1, s. 56; 1901, c. 627; Rev., s. 4570; C.S., s. 6182; 1963, c. 1166, s. 11; 1973, c. 108, s. 74; c. 476, s. 133; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-185.
Application of funds belonging to State facilities.

All moneys and proceeds of property donated to any State facility shall be deposited into the State treasury and accounted for in the appropriate fund as determined by the Secretary and approved by the Office of State Budget and Management. All moneys and proceeds of property donated in which there are special directions for their application and the interest earned on these funds shall be spent as the donor has directed and except as required for deposit with the State treasury, shall not be subject to the provisions of the State Budget Act except for capital improvements projects which shall be authorized and executed in accordance with

G.S. 143C-8-8

and

G.S. 143C-8-9

.

Proceeds from the transfer or sale of surplus, obsolete, or unused equipment of State facilities shall be deposited and accounted for in accordance with G.S. 143-49(4).

The net proceeds from the sale, lease, rental, or other disposition of real estate owned by a State facility shall be deposited and accounted for in accordance with

G.S. 146-30

.

All proceeds from the operation of vending facilities as defined in

G.S. 111-42(d)

and operated by State facilities shall be deposited and accounted for in accordance with the State Budget Act, Chapter 143C of the General Statutes.

All other revenues and other receipts collected by a State facility shall be deposited to the credit of the State treasury in accordance with

G.S. 147-77

.

History.

1899, c. 1, s. 34; Rev., s. 4552; C.S., s. 6167; 1963, c. 1166, s. 13; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2006-203, s. 68.

§ 122C-186.
General Assembly visitors of State facilities.

The members of the General Assembly are ex officio visitors of all State facilities, provided that the common law right of visitation of a State facility is abrogated to the extent that it does not include the right to access to confidential information. This right of access is only as granted by statute.

History.

1963, c. 1184, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§§ 122C-187 through 122C-190.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 6. Quality Assurance.